Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 8 Optometry Law
63-8-120. Discipline of certificate holders.

The board may refuse to issue an annual renewal certificate, may suspend or revoke any certificate issued by it, censure, reprimand, place on probation and assess a civil penalty up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each separate violation whenever the certificate holder is found guilty of any of the following acts or offenses:

Fraud in procuring a license;

Immoral, unprofessional or dishonorable conduct;

Habitual intoxication or addiction or misuse of drugs;

Conviction of a felony;

Use of untruthful or improbable statements or flamboyant or extravagant claims concerning such licensee's professional excellence or abilities;

Practicing under any other name than the certificate holder's own unless board approved;

Failure to renew annual certificate;

Solicitation of optometric services or ophthalmic materials in person or by agent by any means other than advertising authorized by this chapter;

Gross health care liability or a pattern of continued or repeated health care liability, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the practice of optometry;

Practice beyond the scope of the certificate;

Furnishing spectacle prescriptions that do not at least meet the informational requirements established by the board or refusing to furnish a copy of a spectacle prescription at no additional cost to the patient at the end of the examination;

Advertising of optometric services or ophthalmic materials in any manner other than permitted by this chapter or rule and regulation of the board;

Engaging in the practice of optometry as an employee of any person, firm or corporation not engaged primarily in health care delivery;

Division of fees or agreeing to split or divide the fees received for professional services with any person for bringing or referring a patient;

Peddle or sell ophthalmic materials as to render or attempt to render optometric services from house to house or door to door. This shall not prohibit, however, an optometrist from attending, prescribing and furnishing ophthalmic materials to a patient who, by reason of illness or physical or mental infirmity, is confined to the patient's place of abode or in a hospital or other institution;

Signing or making in one's professional capacity any certificate known to be false at the time it is signed or made;

Committing any act that is made unlawful by § 63-8-113; or

Committing any act contrary to this chapter or the rules and regulations of the board.

The board may set guidelines for the implementation of the discipline of certificate holders.

The board may require a mental or physical examination of a certificate holder that the board believes may be a threat to that certificate holder or the public or incapable of practicing optometry in accordance with this chapter and the standards established by the board.

The board may provide conditions upon optometrists continuing to practice or upon the reinstatement of certificates. These conditions may include, but are not limited to, the payment of civil penalties, the attendance or completion of courses of study, the passage of examinations, the passage of physical or mental examinations and the treatment of any physical or mental ailments.

The board shall promulgate rules governing the assessment of costs against a licensee or other person found by the board to have violated any provision of this chapter. The costs assessed by the board may include only those costs directly related to the prosecution of the charges against the licensee or other person, including investigatory costs where appropriate. The board shall determine the appropriate amount of costs, if any, to be assessed in a contested case. These costs shall be reasonable and proportionate in light of the violation committed by the licensee or other person.

Any elected officer of the board, or any duly appointed or elected chair, has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses. Upon probable cause being established, the board, by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members to which the board is entitled, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

Service of a subpoena issued by the board shall be made by the sheriff of the county of residence of the licensee or person upon whom the subpoena is served.

A licensee or person served by subpoena shall have thirty (30) days to request in writing a hearing before the board for the sole purpose of making a special appearance to quash or modify the subpoena. The subpoena for attendance of the person or the production of books and records shall be stayed until the board votes upon the request to quash or modify the subpoena. A majority vote of the members to which the board is entitled shall be required to quash or modify a subpoena.

A motion to appeal from a decision by the board regarding a request to quash or modify a subpoena shall be made to the chancery court in Davidson County within fifteen (15) days of such decision.

If any witness fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by it, the board is authorized to make application to any court of record in this state within the jurisdiction of which the witness is found or resides; and the court shall have power to attach the body of the witness and compel the witness to appear before the board and give testimony or produce books, records or papers as ordered. Any failure to obey the court order may be punished by the court issuing the order as a civil contempt.

Each witness who appears before the board by order of the board shall receive for attendance the compensation provided by law for attendance of witnesses in a court of record, which shall be paid from the funds of the board in the same manner as all other expenses of the board are paid.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 3654a31; Code 1932, § 7038; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 7038; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 43; 1967, ch. 84, § 3; 1979, ch. 406, §§ 22-29; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-822; Acts 1989, ch. 428, § 11; 1999, ch. 440, § 3; 2012, ch. 798, § 41; 2018, ch. 745, § 26.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974)

Attorney General Opinions. The board of optometry has authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

63-8-121. Administrative procedures.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, shall apply to all proceedings of the board and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 3654a32; Code 1932, § 7039; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7039; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 44; 1979, ch. 406, § 30; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-823.

Law Reviews.

Review of Administrative Decisions by Writ of Certiorari in Tennessee (Ben H. Cantrell), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 19.

63-8-122. Penalties.

A violation of this chapter is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1925, ch. 99, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3654a11; Code 1932, § 7028; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 7041.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-824; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 37; 1989, ch. 428, § 12; 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-8-123. Regulation of laboratory practices of optometrists.

The commissioner of health has the authority to regulate the laboratory practices of optometrists to ensure that such practices are in full compliance with the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Act (CLIA) (42 U.S.C. § 263a).

Acts 1993, ch. 295, § 9.

63-8-124. Public policy.

It is the public policy of the state that:

Optometrists rendering visual care to citizens shall practice in an ethical, professional manner;

Optometrists' practices shall be free from any influences that would interfere with their exercise of professional judgment;

The visual welfare of the optometrist's patient shall be the prime consideration at all times; and

Optometrists shall not be associated with any person or persons in any manner that might degrade or reduce the quality of visual care received by the citizens of this state.

Acts 2003, ch. 246, § 1.

63-8-125. Lease between an optometrist and manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer of ophthalmic materials — Control of professional judgment or practice by lessor prohibited.

A manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer of ophthalmic materials who leases space to an optometrist shall not, directly or indirectly, control or attempt to control the professional judgment or practice of an optometrist.

As used in this section, the phrase “control or attempt to control the professional judgment or practice of an optometrist” includes, but is not limited to:

Setting or attempting to set the professional fees or hours of an optometrist or the number of patients to be seen by an optometrist;

Restricting or attempting to restrict an optometrist's discretion to schedule appointments at times convenient to the optometrist's patients;

Terminating or threatening to terminate a lease with an optometrist as a means of controlling or attempting to control the professional judgment or practice of the optometrist;

Sharing with an optometrist telephone lines or other telecommunication services; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall preclude an optometrist from entering into a business arrangement involving the delegation of clerical tasks and functions to persons who are not employees of the optometrist but are under the optometrist's general supervision, so long as the business arrangement is in compliance with state and federal law;

Employing or contracting for the services of an optometrist if part of the optometrist's duties involve the practice of optometry, except that an optometrist may legally contract to provide optometric services to the employees of the manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer;

Paying an optometrist for a service not provided;

Restricting an optometrist's access to leased office space when the optometrist needs such access to provide emergency care to a patient;

Restricting or attempting to restrict the scope of practice of the optometrist in a way that prevents the optometrist from providing the full range of diagnostic and treatment services authorized by Tennessee law; provided, however, that a manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer of ophthalmic materials who leases space to an optometrist may restrict that optometrist from offering spectacles, lenses or frames to the optometrist's patients or to the public in the leased space in direct competition with the lessor;

Limiting or attempting to limit the optometric services and ophthalmic materials that the optometrist may prescribe to the optometrist's patients or the information that may be disseminated to the patients or the public by the optometrist; and

Limiting or attempting to limit the optometrist's exercise of independent professional judgment or responsibility in any way.

A lease between an optometrist and a manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer of ophthalmic materials must comply with all the following provisions:

The lease must not contain any provision through which the manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer of ophthalmic materials controls or attempts to control the professional judgment or practice of the optometrist; and

The leased space must be large enough to include a secure location for storage of confidential patient records. Representatives of the lessor are only permitted on the lessee's premises on reasonable notice and at times not disruptive to the practice of the optometrist. Lessor shall have no access to confidential patient information except in compliance with state and federal law.

The board may promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this section.

The board may file an action in an appropriate court to enjoin any violation of this section by any manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer of ophthalmic materials. If successful in establishing a violation or violations of this section, the board may recover court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

An optometrist may file an action in an appropriate court to enjoin a manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer of ophthalmic materials from controlling or attempting to control the professional judgment or practice of that optometrist. If successful in establishing a violation or violations of this section, the optometrist may also recover any actual damages sustained by the optometrist, as well as court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

The attorney general and reporter may file suit in an appropriate court to enjoin any violation of this section by a manufacturer, wholesaler or retailer of ophthalmic materials. If successful in establishing a violation or violations of this section, the attorney general and reporter may also recover a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each violation of this section, plus court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

Acts 2003, ch. 246, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 246, § 3 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to leases entered into or renewed after July 1, 2003.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

63-8-126. Drug prescriptions.

Any handwritten prescription order for a drug prepared by an optometrist who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription. The handwritten prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing optometrist, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, handwritten in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug, and the month and day that the prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing optometrist must sign the handwritten prescription order on the day it is issued, unless it is a standing order issued in a hospital, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201.

Any typed or computer-generated prescription order for a drug issued by an optometrist who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription order. The typed or computer-generated prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing optometrist, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, recorded in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug, and the month and day that the typed or computer-generated prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing optometrist must sign the typed or computer-generated prescription order on the day it is issued, unless it is a standing order issued in a hospital, nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an optometrist from issuing a verbal prescription order.

All handwritten, typed or computer-generated prescription orders must be issued on either tamper-resistant prescription paper or printed utilizing a technology that results in a tamper-resistant prescription that meets the current centers for medicare and medicaid service guidance to state medicaid directors regarding § 7002(b) of the United States Troop Readiness, Veterans' Care, Katrina Recovery, and Iraq Accountability Appropriations Act of 2007, P.L. 110-28, and meets or exceeds specific TennCare requirements for tamper-resistant prescriptions.

Subdivision (d)(1) shall not apply to prescriptions written for inpatients of a hospital, outpatients of a hospital where the doctor or other person authorized to write prescriptions writes the order into the hospital medical record and then the order is given directly to the hospital pharmacy and the patient never has the opportunity to handle the written order, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201 or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33 or individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 6; 2005, ch. 12, § 5; 2008, ch. 1035, §§ 6, 9; 2010, ch. 795, § 15; 2013, ch. 74, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 1 provided that the title of the act is, and may be cited as, the “Medication Error Reduction Act of 2004”.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 2 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly to create a uniform standard that health care providers must follow in issuing written or electronic prescription orders. This standard is intended to reduce medication related errors, which represent a major source of medical errors in the health care system. The general assembly finds that reducing medical errors will result in greater safety for patients as well as cost savings for the health care system in this state. By adopting these standards, the general assembly intends to promote medical safety for all patients who are issued drug prescriptions in this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 11 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner's or pharmacist's ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 12 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 13 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of this act in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate health care providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 14 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2004.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner's or pharmacist's ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 10 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 11 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of the act in accordance with title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate healthcare providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 19 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before January 1, 2011.

63-8-127. Prohibition against requirement of minimum purchase of ophthalmic materials as a condition of participation in vision or health care plan.

No person shall require an optometrist to purchase a minimum quantity or minimum dollar amount of a specified brand of ophthalmic materials in order to participate as a provider in a vision or other health care plan.

An optometrist may file an action in the chancery court of the county in which the optometrist's office is located to enjoin a violation of this section. If successful in establishing a violation, the optometrist may recover court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

Acts 2005, ch. 123, § 1.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

63-8-128. Inactive licenses to perform pro bono services.

The board of optometry shall establish by rule an inactive license category that allows optometrists to perform services without compensation only for those persons receiving services from organizations that have received a determination of exemption under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)). Such inactive license category shall not authorize any other practice of optometry.

Acts 1997, ch. 345, § 4; T.C.A., § 63–8–133.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 63-8-133 was transferred to § 63-8-128 by the code commission in 2010.

Cross-References. Licensees in armed forces or public health service, § 63-1-110.

63-8-129. [Repealed.]

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 4; T.C.A. § 63-8-134; repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 7, effective January 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-8-129 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

Section 63-8-129 concerning prescriptions for Schedule II controlled substances is repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 7, effective January 1, 2019.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 10 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Former § 63-6-239 concerned prescriptions for Schedule II controlled substances.